Maryland, session 2025, HB0639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0639*

HOUSE BILL 639
SUBTITLE 10. SPORTS VENUES.
19–1001.
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER” MEANS A DRINKING VESSEL
THAT:
(I) IS MADE PRIMARILY OF ALUMINUM OR STAINLESS STEEL;
(II) CAN HOLD UP TO 24 OUNCES OF LIQUID; AND
(III) IS DESIGNED TO BE USED MORE THAN ONCE.
(3) “SPORTS VENUE” MEANS A BUILDING, STRUCTURE, FACILITY, OR
OTHER PLACE WHERE PROFESSIONAL OR COLLEGIATE SPORTING EVENTS ARE
HELD.
(B) (1) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A SPORTS VENUE SHALL ALLOW AN
INDIVIDUAL ATTENDING A PROFESSIONAL OR COLLEGIATE SPORTING EVENT AT
THE SPORTS VENUE TO BRING AND USE A REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER DURING
A SPORTING EVENT.
(2) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A SPORTS VENUE MAY REQUIRE A
REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER TO BE EMPTY ON ENTERING THE SPORTS VENUE.
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 20. SPORTS VENUES.
11–2001.
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER” MEANS A DRINKING VESSEL
THAT:
(I) IS MADE PRIMARILY OF ALUMINUM OR STAINLESS STEEL;
(II) CAN HOLD UP TO 24 OUNCES OF LIQUID; AND

HOUSE BILL 639 3
(III) IS DESIGNED TO BE USED MORE THAN ONCE.
(3) “SPORTS VENUE” MEANS ANY BUILDING, STRUCTURE, FACILITY,
OR PLACE OWNED OR OPERATED BY AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION WHERE
PROFESSIONAL OR COLLEGIATE SPORTING EVENTS ARE HELD.
(B) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION THAT OPERATES A SPORTS VENUE SHALL ALLOW ANY INDIVIDUAL
ATTENDING A PROFESSIONAL OR COLLEGIATE SPORTING EVENT AT A SPORTS
VENUE TO BRING AND USE A REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER DURING A SPORTING
EVENT.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF AN INSTITUTE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
MAY ESTABLISH A RULE OR POLICY REQUIRING REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
TO BE EMPTY ON ENTERING THE SPORTS VENUE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.